New York, session 2025-2026, A1429.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 30.20 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. A conviction shall not be reversed for failure of prompt prose- 4 cution where there is no violation of sections 30.10 and 30.30 of this 5 article, and no showing of material prejudice to the defendant resulting 6 from unreasonable delay. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 8 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03789-01-5